Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,123
Shareholders' action.

(MBCA 8.63) (a) Shareholders' action respecting a director's conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of subdivision (b)(2) of section 21-2,121 if a majority of the votes cast by the holders of all qualified shares are in favor of the transaction after (1) notice to shareholders describing the action to be taken respecting the transaction, (2) provision to the corporation of the information referred to in subsection (b) of this section, and (3) communication to the shareholders entitled to vote on the transaction of the information that is the subject of required disclosure to the extent the information is not known by them. In the case of shareholders' action at a meeting, the shareholders entitled to vote shall be determined as of the record date for notice of the meeting.

(b) A director who has a conflicting interest respecting the transaction shall, before the shareholders' vote, inform the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to count votes, in writing, of the number of shares that the director knows are not qualified shares under subsection (c) of this section and the identity of the holders of those shares.

(c) For purposes of this section: (1) Holder means and held by refers to shares held by a record shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, and an unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner; and (2) qualified shares means all shares entitled to be voted with respect to the transaction except for shares that the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to count votes either knows, or under subsection (b) of this section is notified, are held by (i) a director who has a conflicting interest respecting the transaction or (ii) a related person of the director, excluding a person described in subdivision (5)(vi) of section 21-2,120.

(d) A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of all qualified shares constitutes a quorum for purposes of compliance with this section. Subject to subsection (e) of this section, shareholders' action that otherwise complies with this section is not affected by the presence of holders, or by the voting, of shares that are not qualified shares.

(e) If a shareholders' vote does not comply with subsection (a) of this section solely because of a director's failure to comply with subsection (b) of this section and if the director establishes that the failure was not intended to influence and did not in fact determine the outcome of the vote, the court may take such action respecting the transaction and the director and may give such effect, if any, to the shareholders' vote as the court considers appropriate in the circumstances.

(f) When shareholders' action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws or a provision of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the shareholders in which action shares that are not qualified shares may participate.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 123;

Laws 2017, LB35, § 19.